Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7574.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-3-6.3 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled "Registration
of Vehicles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-6.3. Unpaid out-of-state toll amounts, administrative fees, and fines — Denial of
registration — Denial of transfer of registration — Denial of renewal of registration and
licenses.
(a) Upon receipt of a request from another state or other entity with similar tolling authority
with which the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority has entered into an agreement providing
for the reciprocal treatment of out-of-state toll violators to take action against a toll violator, the
Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall conduct an independent review of each toll
violation that forms the basis for such request, which shall include a review of photographic, video,
or other visual evidence, to determine that the requesting state or other entity with similar tolling
authority imposed any toll amounts, administrative fees, and/or fines against the actual registered
owner of the motor vehicle.
(b) As part of its independent review, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall
provide written notice to the registered owner of the motor vehicle in question. The registered
owner shall have ten (10) days from the date on the written notice to contact the Rhode Island
turnpike and bridge authority and to provide information, documentation, and any other evidence
contesting the requested action against the out-of-state toll violator. Thereafter, the Rhode Island
turnpike and bridge authority shall consider all of the information, documentation, and any other

evidence provided as part of its independent review.
(c) If after its independent review the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority is
satisfied that any toll amounts, administrative fees, and/or fines are properly imposed against the
actual registered owner of the motor vehicle and the registered owner could be subject to reporting
to the division of motor vehicles pursuant to § 24-12-37 if such toll violations had occurred on
tolled projects in this state, the Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority may report the registered
owner to the division of motor vehicles.
(d) The division of motor vehicles shall not renew any operator’s license or registration
upon expiration thereof; register any motor vehicle; or transfer the registration of any motor vehicle
of any person reported to it pursuant to subsection (c) of this section until any toll amounts,
administrative fees, and/or fines owed to the other state or other entity with similar tolling authority
have been paid in full or the person has entered into, and is in current compliance with, a repayment
agreement with respect to any amounts owed. The Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority shall
provide a copy of any notification received from the other state or other entity with similar tolling
authority regarding full payment of amounts owed or the existence of a repayment agreement to
the division of motor vehicles within five (5) business days of receipt. Within five (5) business days
of receiving such notification, the division of motor vehicles shall renew the person’s license and
renew, transfer, or issue the person’s registration. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply
to any vehicle owned by a rental company as defined in § 31-34.1-1.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004894
========
LC004894 - Page 2 of 3